Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-5,219
Certificate of inspection; when required; display of certificate.

Prior to any newly installed conveyance being used for the first time, the property owner or lessee shall obtain a certificate of inspection from the State Fire Marshal. A fee established under section 81-5,214 shall be paid for the certificate of inspection. A licensed elevator contractor shall complete and submit first-time registrations for new installations to the state elevator inspector for the inspector's approval. A certificate of inspection shall be clearly displayed in an elevator car and on or in each other conveyance.

Laws 2006, LB 489, § 11;

R.S.1943, (2010), § 48-2511;

Laws 2019, LB301, § 55;

Laws 2025, LB415, § 24.